Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB991.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 24, 1931 (P.L.1206, No.331), known as The First Class Township Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXIV-ASTORM WATER MANAGEMENTPLANS AND FACILITIESSection 2401-A. Storm water management systems authorized.The board of commissioners may plan, design, construct, assemble, install and alter facilities, including inlets, outlets, systems of piping, diversion terraces, grass waterways, energy dissipaters, storm water retention devices and natural or artificial infiltration areas, to manage surface water runoff.12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2402-A. Construction of storm water management facilities.(a) Management.--The board of commissioners may acquire by purchase, deed of dedication or eminent domain proceedings all or part of an existing system or facility for the management of surface water runoff that may have been established or constructed by a property owner in the township or establish, construct and maintain systems or facilities in the best interest of the township.(b) Purchase.--If the board of commissioners and the owners of systems agree upon a price to be paid by the township, the purchase may be consummated if the amount to be paid does not exceed the actual value of the facilities to be transferred.(c) Damages.--If the board of commissioners acquires the system by the exercise of eminent domain, the damages shall be determined by viewers under this act for eminent domain proceedings.Section 2403-A. System management. (a) Powers.--When exercising the powers under this article, the board of commissioners shall manage storm water originating in or passing through the township in a manner consistent with the requirements of the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act, and the storm water management guidelines and regulations that may be adopted by the Department of Environmental Protection.(b) Plan.--All storm water management activities shall be consistent with a watershed storm water management plan approved by the Department of Environmental Protection.(c) Review.--If storm water management activities are undertaken in watersheds for which there is no approved storm 20250HB0991PN1329 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 water management plan, all drawings, documents, profiles and designs and descriptions of the proposed activities to be undertaken by the township shall be submitted to the county conservation district for review and comment before the initiation of earthmoving activities. The county conservation district shall have 30 days to review and respond with comments to the board of commissioners. Failure to respond within that time constitutes favorable comment by the county conservation district.Section 2404-A. Ordinances.(a) Ordinance provisions.--The board of commissioners may enact storm water management ordinances and require persons conducting earthmoving activities to obtain approval from the board of commissioners for those activities. Ordinances must be consistent with watershed storm water management plans where they exist and in all cases must be consistent with the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act.(b) Maintenance of facilities.--The board of commissioners may enact and enforce ordinances to govern and regulate the planning, management, implementation, construction and maintenance of storm water management facilities. Section 2405-A. Fees. (a) Funding.--For the purposes of funding the construction, maintenance and operation of storm water management facilities, systems and plans authorized under this article, a township may assess reasonable and uniform fees based in whole or in part on the characteristics of the property benefited by the facilities, systems and plans. In establishing the fees, the township shall consider and provide appropriate exemptions or credits for 20250HB0991PN1329 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 properties which have installed and are maintaining storm water management facilities that meet best management practices and are approved or inspected by the township.(A) FUNDING.--(1) FOR THE PURPOSES OF FUNDING THE CONSTRUCTION, MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION OF STORM WATER MANAGEMENT FACILITIES, SYSTEMS AND PLANS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS ARTICLE, A TOWNSHIP MAY ASSESS REASONABLE AND UNIFORM FEES BASED IN WHOLE OR IN PART ON THE CHARACTERISTICS OF THE PROPERTY BENEFITED BY THE FACILITIES, SYSTEMS AND PLANS.(2) IN ESTABLISHING THE FEES, THE TOWNSHIP MAY INCLUDE A MEASURE OF A PROPERTY'S IMPERVIOUS SURFACE AS DETERMINED BY THE TOWNSHIP. ALL PROPERTIES CONTAINING IMPERVIOUS SURFACE ARE PRESUMED TO BENEFIT FROM A TOWNSHIP'S STORM WATER PLANNING, MANAGEMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE TERM "IMPERVIOUS SURFACE" MEANS AN AREA, MATERIAL, STRUCTURE, SURFACE OR IMPROVEMENT THAT DOES NOT ALLOW OR THAT REDUCES OR PREVENTS INFILTRATION OF WATER INTO SOIL, INCLUDING COMPACTED DIRT, GRAVEL, CONCRETE, ASPHALT, ROADS, SIDEWALKS, PARKING LOTS, DRIVEWAYS, PATIOS, ROOFS, GARAGES AND STORAGE SHEDS.(3) IN ESTABLISHING THE FEES, THE TOWNSHIP SHALL CONSIDER AND PROVIDE APPROPRIATE EXEMPTIONS OR CREDITS FOR PROPERTIES WHICH HAVE INSTALLED AND ARE MAINTAINING STORM WATER MANAGEMENT FACILITIES THAT MEET BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES AND ARE APPROVED OR INSPECTED BY THE TOWNSHIP.(b) Fees.--A fee levied by the township can be assessed in one of the following methods:(1) On all properties in the township.(2) On all properties benefited by a specific storm 20250HB0991PN1329 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 water project.(3) By establishing a storm water management district and assessing the fee on all property owners in the district.(c) Authorization.--A fee collected for the purposes of storm water management may only be used for the purposes authorized by this article.(d) Filing.--The assessments shall be filed with the township treasurer.(e) Payments.--An ordinance shall specify whether payments are to be made by annual or more frequent installments.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0991PN1329 - 5 - 1234567891011